Florida, session 2026, SB888.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âPresent subsections (3), (4), and (5) of section 30 725.08, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5), 31 (6), and (7), respectively, new subsections (3) and (4) are 32 added to that section, and subsections (1) and (2) and present 33 subsection (5) of that section are amended, to read: 34 725.08âDesign professional contracts; limitation in 35 indemnification.â 36 (1)âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 725.06, if a 37 design professional provides professional services to or for a 38 contracting party public agency, the contracting party agency 39 may require in a professional services contract with the design 40 professional that the design professional indemnify and hold 41 harmless the contracting party agency, and its officers and 42 employees, from liabilities, damages, losses, and costs, 43 including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney attorneysâ 44 fees, only to the extent caused by the negligence, recklessness, 45 or intentionally wrongful conduct of the design professional and 46 other persons employed or used utilized by the design 47 professional in the performance of the contract. 48 (2)âExcept as specifically provided in subsection (1), a 49 professional services contract entered into with a public agency 50 may not require that the design professional defend, indemnify, 51 or hold harmless the contracting party or agency, its employees, 52 officers, directors, or agents from any liability, damage, loss, 53 claim, action, or proceeding, and any such contract provision is 54 shall be void as against the public policy of this state. 55 (3)(a)âA professional services contract must require the 56 design professional to perform the services with the level of 57 professional skill and care ordinarily provided by a competent 58 design professional practicing under the same or similar 59 circumstances and professional licenses as expeditiously as is 60 prudent. 61 (b)âA professional services contract may not subject a 62 design professional to a standard of care different than that 63 provided in paragraph (a). 64 (c)âIf the standard of care in a professional services 65 contract differs from the professional skill and care as 66 described in paragraph (a), paragraph (a) applies. 67 (4)âA professional services contract may not require a 68 design professional to list a contracting party or any other 69 person or entity as an additional insured on the design 70 professionalâs policy of professional liability insurance. 71 (7)(5)âThis section does not affect contracts or agreements 72 entered into before July 1, 2026 the effective date of this 73 section. 74 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.